Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1508
Application by bank or bank holding company; terms and conditions.

Whenever an application by a bank or a bank holding company is received by the Department of Banking and Finance to acquire any other financial institution, the following terms and conditions shall be met and such acquisitions shall be valid only when and for as long as these conditions are satisfied:

(1) The acquiring bank holding company may not apply for and it shall not operate such a financial institution as a nonbank subsidiary under section 4 of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as such act existed on July 20, 2002, unless such financial institution is a savings association as defined by section 2(j) of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as such act existed on July 20, 2002;

(2) The financial institution to be acquired by a bank or a bank holding company shall be subject to the conditions upon which a bank incorporated under the laws of this state may establish, maintain, relocate, or close any of its offices pursuant to the Nebraska Banking Act, but nothing in sections 8-1506 to 8-1510 or any other provision of law shall require divestiture of any branch or office in operation at the time of acquisition; and

(3) A financial institution to be acquired by a bank holding company shall be subject to the provisions of section 3 of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as such act existed on July 20, 2002, and those rules and regulations that apply to bank subsidiaries of bank holding companies as are or may be established by both the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and the Director of Banking and Finance.

Laws 1983, LB 241, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 239, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 795, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 956, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 857, § 3.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.01.